Massachusetts, session 194th, S3001.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after Section 228 subsection (b) the following section:-
(c) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), licensed massage therapists must
complete continuing education as a condition of license renewal. Such continuing education shall
meet the following requirements:
(1) Complete 20 hours of continuing education every two years, including: (i) Two (2)
hours on ethics in massage therapy, completed in person; (ii) One (1) hour on Massachusetts
massage therapy laws and rules, which may be completed online or in person; (iii) Up to six (6)
hours of continuing education may be completed online or through home study courses; and (iv)
The remaining hours must be completed in person through live classes or webinars.
(2) Continuing education courses must be: (i) Approved by the National Certification
Board for Therapeutic Massage and Bodywork (NCBTMB); or (ii) Offered by a provider
of 2

approved by the Board of Registration of Massage Therapy of the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts.
(3) Licensed massage therapists must retain documentation of completed continuing
education hours for a minimum of four (4) years and provide such documentation to the Board
upon request.
(4) At the time of renewal, licensed massage therapists shall attest to the completion of
required continuing education hours and to holding current certification in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation (CPR) and the use of an automated external defibrillator (AED).
of 2